Utah statutes.
67-19a-401.   Time limits for submission and advancement of grievance by aggrieved employee -- Voluntary termination of employment -- Group grievances.

(1)  Subject to the provisions of Part 3, Grievance Procedures, and the restrictions contained in this part, a career service employee may have a grievance addressed by following the procedures specified in this part.

(2)  The employee and the person to whom the grievance is directed may agree in writing to waive or extend grievance steps specified under Subsection 67-19a-402(1), (2), or (3) or the time limits specified for those grievance steps, as outlined in Section 67-19a-402.

(3)  Any writing made under Subsection (2) shall be submitted to the administrator.

(4)  Except as provided under Subsection (6), if the employee fails to advance the grievance to the next procedural step within the time limits established in this part:

(a)  the employee waives the right to advance the grievance or to obtain judicial review of the grievance; and

(b)  the grievance is considered to be settled based on the decision made at the last procedural step.

(5) (a)  An employee may submit a grievance for review under this chapter only if the employee submits the grievance:

(i)  within 20 working days after the event giving rise to the grievance; or

(ii)  within 20 working days after the employee has knowledge of the event giving rise to the grievance.

(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (5)(a), an employee may not submit a grievance more than one year after the event giving rise to the grievance.

(6)  The provisions of Subsections (4) and (5)(a) do not apply if the employee meets the requirements for excusable neglect established by rule.

(7)  A person who has voluntarily terminated the person's employment with the state may not submit a grievance after the person has terminated the employment.

(8) (a)  If several employees allege the same grievance, the employees may submit a group grievance by following the procedures and requirements of this chapter.

(b)  In submitting a group grievance, each aggrieved employee shall sign the grievance.

(c)  The administrator may not treat a group grievance as a class action, but may select one aggrieved employee's grievance and address that grievance as a test case.



Amended by Chapter 249, 2010 General Session

